Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8326.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-2 of the General Laws entitled "School Committees and
Superintendents [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-2-3.1. School calendar flexibility during declared states of emergency.
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule, or regulation requiring a minimum
number of school days or instructional hours for public schools in the state, any day or days during
which a public school is closed due to a state of emergency declared by the governor of the State
of Rhode Island shall be deemed excused for purposes of compliance with the minimum school
days calendar requirements,
(b) School districts and public schools shall not be required to submit individual waiver
requests to the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education for instructional
days missed as a result of a declared state of emergency.
(c) Any school day canceled due to a declared state of emergency shall not be required to
be made up by extending the school year, adding additional school days, or otherwise modifying
the approved school calendar.
(d) The commissioner of elementary and secondary education may issue general guidance
to school districts regarding emergency closures, but shall not require individual waivers for
closures occurring during the officially declared state of emergency period.
(e) The provisions of this section shall apply only to school closures resulting directly from

a natural disaster, severe weather event, public safety emergency, or other emergency conditions
for which the governor has issued an official state of emergency declaration.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006134
========
LC006134 - Page 2 of 3